Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1,113
Gift or acquisition of real property; state building division; Task Force for Building Renewal; reviews required; report; approval; when required.

(1) Any gift of real property with a value in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars which is proposed to be made to a state agency and any acquisition of real property which will be made by a state agency using gifts of money, if the combined total of such gifts of money exceeds two hundred fifty thousand dollars, shall be reviewed by the state building division and the Task Force for Building Renewal pursuant to sections 81-176, 81-1108.15, and 81-1114. Such review shall include any potential matching of state funds, any plans, specifications, and other construction or repair documents, and any potential maintenance requirements. Subsequent to such review, the state building division and the task force shall submit a report to the Governor, the Committee on Building Maintenance, and the Legislative Fiscal Analyst. The report shall include a summary of the review of the plans, specifications, and other construction or repair documents and potential maintenance requirements, shall outline the terms and conditions of the proposed gift or acquisition, and shall include a recommendation. The report submitted to the committee and the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall be submitted electronically.

(2) Any gift of real property or acquisition of real property that is subject to review under subsection (1) of this section shall be approved by the Governor and the Legislature prior to acceptance or acquisition. If the Legislature is not in session, the Executive Board of the Legislative Council, after recommendation by the Committee on Building Maintenance, may approve such gift or acquisition along with the Governor.

(3) No construction, repair, maintenance, or other work related to the proposed gift or acquisition shall be initiated prior to receiving the review and approval required by this section.

(4) If an acquisition of real property has been approved pursuant to this section, gifts of tangible or intangible personal property or money funding the acquisition, in whole or in part, do not require approval pursuant to sections 81-1,114 and 81-1,115.

Laws 1995, LB 530, § 13;

Laws 1999, LB 369, § 3;

Laws 2006, LB 1038, § 2;

Laws 2008, LB1116, § 8;

Laws 2011, LB264, § 4;

Laws 2012, LB761, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 183;

R.S.1943, (2014), § 81-1108.33;

Laws 2024, LB998, § 5.

Committee on Building Maintenance, see section 81-185.

Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education, see Article VII, section 14, Constitution of Nebraska and section 85-1403.

Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education Act, see section 85-1401.